apertium-jta.jta.twol
! Adapted from apertium-tam available at https://github.com/apertium/apertium-tam.git, by Maathavan Nithiyananthan <maathumaathavan@gmail.com>

Alphabet
    அ ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ஃ க ங ச ஞ	ட ண த ந ப ம ய ர ல வ	ழ ள ற ன
   ா ி  ீ  ு  ூ  ெ  ே  ை  ொ  ோ  ௌ  ௗ   ்
   ! Grantha
   ஶ ஜ ஷ ஸ ஹ க்ஷ
     %{X%}:ங %{X%}:ஞ %{X%}:ண %{X%}:ந %{X%}:ம %{X%}:ன %{X%}:க 
     %{X%}:ச %{X%}:ட %{X%}:த %{X%}:ப %{X%}:ற %{X%}:ய %{X%}:ர
     %{X%}:ல %{X%}:வ %{X%}:ழ %{X%}:ள
     ! Vowels
     %{VOW%}:ா %{VOW%}:ீ %{VOW%}:ூ %{VOW%}:ே %{VOW%}:ோ %{VOW%}:ௗ
     %{A%}:0
     %{Av%}:0
     %{An%}:0
     %{Al%}:அ
     %{AA%}:ா
     %{AAv%}:ா
     %{AAm%}:ா
     %{AAp%}:ா
     %{AAIrr%}:ா
     %{AAIrr2%}:ா
     %{I%}:ி %{I%}:0
     %{Im%}:ி
     %{II%}:ீ
     %{Il%}:இ
     %{U%}:ு %{U%}:0
     %{Uu%}:ு
     %{UIrr%}:ு
     %{UIrr2%}:ு
     %{UA%}:ு
     %{Ul%}:உ
     %{Um%}:ு %{Um%}:0
     %{Uimp%}:ு
     %{UU%}:ூ
     %{UUl%}:ஊ %{UUl%}:ூ
     %{E%}:ெ %{E%}:0
     %{El%}:எ %{El%}:ஏ
     %{EE%}:ே
     %{EEm%}:ே
     %{EEv%}:ே
     %{AI%}:ை
     %{AIv%}:ை
     %{AIE%}:ே %{AIE%}:ெ
     %{O%}:ொ %{O%}:0
     %{OO%}:ோ
     %{OOv%}:ோ
     %{OOm%}:ோ
     %{AU%}:ௌ %{AU%}:0
     %{AUU%}:ௗ
     ! Pulli
     %{Pul%}:் %{Pul%}:0
     %{Pulo%}:் %{Pulo%}:0
     ! Consonants
     %{M%}:ம %{M%}:த %{M%}:ங
     %{N%}:ன %{N%}:ங
     %{Nn%}:ன
     %{NN%}:ண %{NN%}:ங
     %{NT%}:ன %{NT%}:ண
     %{NP%}:ன %{NP%}:ங
     %{NK%}:ன %{NK%}:ர
     %{K%}:க
     %{Kk%}:க
     %{L%}:ல
     %{PL%}:ள
     %{LK%}:ள %{LK%}:க
     %{LN%}:ள %{LN%}:ண
     %{Ln%}:ல %{Ln%}:ன
     %{Lno%}:ல %{Lno%}:ன %{Lno%}:க %{Lno%}:ற
     %{LLn%}:ல
     %{LR%}:ல %{LR%}:ற
     %{PLR%}:ள %{PLR%}:ங
     %{R%}:ர
     %{Ro%}:ர %{Ro%}:0
     %{RP%}:ர   
     %{RR%}:ற
     %{T%}:ட
     %{LT%}:ள %{LT%}:ட
     %{TR%}:ட %{TR%}:ற
     %{TH%}:த
     %{THl%}:த
     %{P%}:ப
     %{Pi%}:ப %{Pi%}:0
     %{pI%}:ி %{pI%}:0
     %{Y%}:ய
     %{Yy%}:ய
     %{C%}:ச
     %{V%}:வ
     %{AN%}:ங %{AN%}:0
     %{NR%}:ங %{NR%}:ன %{NR%}:0
     ! Noun case irregulars
     %{Irefr%}:ி %{Irefr%}:0
     %{Igen%}:ி
     ! Morpheme boundary
     %>:0;


Sets

Consonant = க ங ச ஞ	ட ண த ந ப ம ய ர ல வ	ழ ள ற ன ;
ConsonantR = க ங ச ஞ	ட ண த ந ப ம ய ர ல வ	ழ ள ன ;
Mellinam = ங ஞ ண ந ம ன;
Vallinam = க ச ட த ப ற;
Idaiyinam = ய ர ல வ ழ ள;
ConsonantLeft = %{NP%} %{M%} %{N%} %{Nn%} %{NN%} %{NK%} %{K%} %{Kk%} %{L%} %{PL%} %{LK%} %{LN%} %{Ln%} %{Lno%} %{LLn%} %{PLR%} %{LR%} %{R%} %{Ro%} %{RP%} %{RR%} %{T%} %{LT%} %{TR%} %{TH%} %{P%} %{Y%} %{Yy%} %{C%} %{NR%} ;

RemConsonant = Mellinam ல ;

Vowel = அ ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ஃ ;
VowWithSym = ஆ இ ஈ உ ஊ எ ஏ ஐ ஒ ஓ ஔ ;
VowSym = ா  ி  ீ  ு  ூ  ெ  ே  ை  ொ  ோ  ௌ ;
ShortVowSym = ி  ு  ெ  ை  ொ;
LongVowSym =  ா  ீ  ூ  ே  ோ  ௌ;
SuffixVowels = %{AIE%} %{A%} %{AA%} %{I%} %{II%} %{U%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{EE%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{OO%} %{AU%} %{AUU%} %{Irefr%} ;
SuffixVowelsA = %{AIE%} %{AA%} %{I%} %{II%} %{U%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{EE%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{OO%} %{AU%} %{AUU%} %{Irefr%} ;
SuffixVowelsIr = %{AIE%} %{AA%} %{I%} %{II%} %{U%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{EE%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{OO%} %{AU%} %{AUU%} ;
SuffixVowelsU = %{AIE%} %{A%} %{AA%} %{I%} %{II%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{EE%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{OO%} %{AU%} %{Irefr%} %{AUU%} ;
SuffixVowelsI = %{AIE%} %{A%} %{AA%} %{II%} %{U%} %{UU%} %{E%} %{EE%} %{AI%} %{O%} %{OO%} %{AU%} %{AUU%} ;
VowelRight = ShortVowSym LongVowSym ;

Rules 

! Pulli
"Removing Pulli"
%{Pul%}:0 <=> :Consonant _ %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{AAm%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{OOm%}: | %{EEm%}: | %{Igen%}: ] ;
              %{M%}: _ %>: [ %{AAm%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{OOm%}: ] ;
              _ %>: %{UA%}: ;
              _ %>: %{An%}: ;
              %{NR%}: _ %>: %{R%}: %{Pul%}: ;
              %{PLR%}: _ %>: %{R%}: ;
              %{PL%}: _ %>: %{T%}: ;
              %{PL%}: _ %>: %{AA%}: .#. ;
              %{TH%}: _ %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{AAm%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{EEm%}: | %{OOm%}: ] ;
              [ %{NP%}: | %{NR%}: | %{NK%}: | %{RP%}: ] _ %>: %{Igen%}: :0 %{Pul%}: %{R%}: ;
              :Consonant :0 _ %>: %{VOW%}: ;
                except 
                ப: ல: _ %>: ;
                %{M%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;

"Keeping Pulli"
%{Pul%}:் <=> _ .#. ;
              _ %>: :RemConsonant ;
              _ %>: %{K%}: ;
              %{K%}: _ %{K%}: ;
              %{N%}: _ %{R%}: ;
              %{T%}: _ %{T%}: ;
              _ %>: %{V%}: %{I%}: ;
              _ %>: %{P%}: %{I%}: ;
              _ %>: %{P%}: %{Pul%}: %{P%}: %{I%}: ;
              _ %>: :த %{Pul%}: ;
              :ந _ :த ;
              :த _ :த ;
              :ச _ :ச ;
              :ஞ _ :ச ;
              :ங _ :க ;
              %{P%}: _ %{P%}: ;
              :ம _ %>: %{P%}: ;
              [ SuffixVowels: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: | %{THl%}: | %{AAIrr2%}: ] [ %{Yy%}: | %{Y%}: | %{Ln%}: | %{Lno%}: | %{LN%}: | %{LLn%}: | %{LR%}: | %{LT%}: | %{NT%}: | :ண | :ர ] _ %>: [  %{RR%}: | %{P%}: | %{T%}: | :த | :ச | :வ | :ன ] ;
              [ SuffixVowels: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: | %{THl%}: | %{AAIrr2%}: ] [ %{Yy%}: | %{Ln%}: | %{Lno%}: | %{LN%}: | %{LLn%}: | %{LR%}: | %{NT%}: | :ண | :ர ] _ 0: %>: SuffixVowels: ;              
              %{M%}: _ 0: %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{Igen%}: ] ;
              [ %{NP%}: | %{NR%}: | %{NK%}: | %{RP%}: ] :0 %>: %{Igen%}: :0 _ %{R%}: ;
              %{Y%}: _ 0: %>: %{U%}: ;
              %{T%}: _ 0: %>: [ SuffixVowelsA: | %{AAv%}: ] ;
              %{T%}: _ 0: (%{U%}:) %>: %{A%}: :Consonant ;
              %{NP%}: _ %>: %{T%}: ;

"Adding Pulli"
0:Vy <=> %{AN%}: _ %>: %{K%}: ;
         %{T%}: _ 0: %{U%}: %>: SuffixVowelsA: ;
         %{T%}: _ 0: (%{U%}:) %>: %{A%}: :Consonant ;
         %{RR%}: _ 0: %{U%}: %>: SuffixVowels: ;
         %{AA%}: %>: 0: _ %{K%}: ;
         [ %{L%}: | %{Ln%}: | %{LLn%}: ] _ 0: %>: SuffixVowels: ;
         [ %{T%}: | %{RR%}: ] _ %{U%}: %>: %{TR%}: ;
         [ %{Al%}: | %{Il%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: ] 0: _ 0: %>: %{Al%}: ;
         SuffixVowels: %>: 0: _ %{Kk%}: ;
         %{T%}: _ %{U%}: %>: 0: %{Uu%}: ;
         where Vy in ( ் ) ;

! -m ending
"Keep M to m if end of word"
%{M%}:ம <=> _ %{Pul%}: .#. ;
             _ %{Pul%}: %>: [ %{AAm%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Im%}: | %{EEm%}: | %{OOm%}: ] ;

"Transform underlying M to T when vowel"
%{M%}:த <=> _ %{Pul%}: 0: %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{Igen%}: ] ;

"Insert a second T"
0:த <=> %{M%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{Igen%}: ] ;

! -t ending
"Change to RR"
%{TR%}:ற <=> %{RR%}: :Vy %{U%}: %>: _ ;
              where Vy in ( ் ) ;

"Change to T"
%{TR%}:ட <=> %{T%}: :Vy %{U%}: %>: _ ;
              where Vy in ( ் ) ;

! N addition
"Starting with K"
%{AN%}:ங <=> _ :Vy %>: %{K%}: ;
              where Vy in ( ் ) ; 

! Accusative case
"Removing AA when faced with SuffixVowels"
%{AA%}:0 <=> _ %>: SuffixVowelsIr: .#. ;
            :வ %>: _ ;

! Genitive case
"Removing I for nouns ending in N or R"
%{Igen%}:0 <=> [ %{NP%}: | %{RP%}: | %{NR%}: | %{NK%}: ] %{Pul%}: %>: _ %{N%}: %{Pul%}: %{R%}: ;

"Removing N for nouns ending in N or R"
%{N%}:0 <=> [ %{NP%}: | %{RP%}: | %{NR%}: | %{NK%}: ] %{Pul%}: %>: %{Igen%}: _ %{Pul%}: %{R%}: ;

! Referential case
"Removing I when Referential and noun ends in AA"
%{Irefr%}:0 <=> %{AA%}: %>: _ ;
                [ %{El%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{THl%}: ] %{NP%}: %{Pul%}: %>: 0: _ ;

! Word endings 
"Inserting ய"
0:ய <=> [ %{AI%}: | %{I%}: | %{II%}: | %{EE%}: | %{E%}: | %{AIE%}: ] (%{AN%}:) _ %>: [ :VowelRight | %{Irefr%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{AAm%}: | %{OOm%}: | %{EEm%}: | %{A%}: | %{AAp%}: ] ;
         %{AA%}: _ %>: %{I%}: ;
         %{Yy%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;
         %{Yy%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: ம: ;
         except
         [ %{AI%}: | %{I%}: | %{II%}: | %{EE%}: | %{E%}: | %{AIE%}: ] (%{AN%}:) _ %>: %{VOW%}: ;

"Inserting வ"
0:வ <=> %{AA%}: _ %>: [ SuffixVowelsI: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{AAm%}: | %{OOm%}: | %{EEm%}: ] ;
         %{A%}: _ %>: [SuffixVowelsA: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{AAm%}: | %{OOm%}: | %{EEm%}: ] ;
         [ %{Al%}: | %{Il%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: ] _ 0: 0: %>: %{Al%}: ;
         [ %{Al%}: | %{Il%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: ] 0: 0: _ %>: %{Al%}: ;
         %{U%}: _ %>: %{AAp%}: ;

"Insert a second RR"
0:ற <=> %{RR%}: :Vy _ %{U%}: %>: SuffixVowels: ;
         where Vy in ( ் ) ;

"Insert a second T"
0:ட <=> %{T%}: :Vy _ (%{U%}:) %>: [ SuffixVowelsA: | %{AAv%}: ] ;
        %{T%}: :Vy _ (%{U%}:) %>: %{A%}: :Consonant ;
        %{T%}: 0: %{U%}: %>: _ %{Uu%}: ; 
              where Vy in ( ் ) ;

"Insert a second L"
0:ல <=> [ %{L%}: | %{Ln%}: | %{LLn%}: ] :Vy _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;
         where Vy in ( ் ) ;

"Inserting ள"
0:ள <=> %{LN%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;

"Inserting ண"
0:ண <=> %{NN%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;

"Inserting க"
0:க <=> %{AA%}: %>: _ 0: %{K%}: ;
         SuffixVowels: %>: _ 0: %{Kk%}: ;

"Inserting ன"
0:ன <=> [ %{El%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{THl%}: ] %{NP%}: %{Pul%}: %>: _ SuffixVowelsA: ;
         %{NT%}: %{Pul%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;

"Dropping Al"
%{Al%}:0 <=> [ %{Al%}: | %{Il%}: | %{Ul%}: | %{El%}: ] 0: 0: 0: %>: _ ;

"UUl becomes uu after consonants"
%{UUl%}:ூ <=> :Consonant %>: _ ;

"AIE drops before Y"
%{AIE%}:0 <=> _ :ய %>: ;

"Removing  ு"
%{U%}:0 <=> _ %>: SuffixVowelsU: ;
            SuffixVowelsU: %>: _ ;
            _ %>: [ %{U%}: | %{Um%}: | %{Uimp%}: | %{Im%}: | %{AAm%}: | %{EEm%}: | %{OOm%}: ] ;
            [ %{T%}: | %{RR%}: ] 0: _ %>: %{TR%}: ;
            %{T%}: 0: _ %>: 0: %{Uu%}: ;
            _ %>: %{AAv%}: ;
            _ %>: %{Av%}: ;
            _ %>: %{VOW%}:ூ ;
            :த _ %>: %{P%}: %{Pul%}: %{P%}: ;

"Removing  ு"
%{Uimp%}:0 <=> SuffixVowelsU: %>: _ ;
               %{AAIrr%}: %>: _ ;
       
"Removing UA"
%{UA%}:0 <=> %{AA%}: %>: _ ;

"Starting with K"
%{M%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{N%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{NN%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{LK%}:க <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{NK%}:ர <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{NP%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{NR%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with AA or T"
%{PL%}:0 <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{AA%}: .#. ;
             _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{T%}: ;

"Starting with T"
%{LN%}:ண <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{T%}: ;

"Starting with T"
%{NT%}:ண <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{T%}: ;

"Starting with T"
%{LT%}:ட <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: :Consonant ;

"Starting with R or N"
%{Ln%}:ன <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: [ %{RR%}: | :ன ] ;

"Starting with N"
%{LLn%}:ன <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{Nn%}: ;

"Starting with Consonant"
%{LR%}:ற <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: [ :Consonant | ConsonantLeft: ] ;

"Starting with K"
%{Ln%}:ற <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: [ %{K%}: | %{P%}: ] ;

"Starting with R"
%{NR%}:0 <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{R%}: %{Pul%}: ;

"Starting with R"
%{PLR%}:0 <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{R%}: ;

"Starting with K"
%{PLR%}:ங <=> _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{K%}: ;

"Starting with C"
%{Y%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{C%}: ;

"Ending with nothing or genitive"
%{NR%}:ன <=> _ %{Pul%}: .#. ;
              _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{Igen%}:0 :0 %{Pul%}: %{R%}: ;
              _ %{Pul%}: %>: SuffixVowels: ;

"Ending with nothing"
%{PLR%}:ள <=> _ %{Pul%}: .#. ;

! Irregular verb forms
"Inserting Ru/Ra for thaa, vaa"
0:ர <=> [ :த | :வ ] %{AAIrr%}: _ 0: %>: [ %{K%}: | :வ ] ;
        [ :த | :வ ] %{AAIrr%}: _ %>: SuffixVowels: ;
        [ :த | :வ ] %{AAIrr%}: _ %>: %{UIrr%}: ;
        [ :த | :வ ] %{AAIrr%}: _ %>: %{U%}: :ங %{Pul%}: :க ; 

"Inserting rU for thaa, vaa"
0:Vy <=> [ :த | :வ ] %{AAIrr%}: 0: _ %>: [ %{K%}: | :வ ] ;
         where Vy in ( ு ) ;

"Dropping AA for thaa, vaa"
%{AAIrr%}:0 <=> [ :த | :வ ] _ (0: 0:) %>: :ConsonantR ;
             [ :த | :வ ] _ 0: %>: [ SuffixVowels: | %{UIrr%}: ] ;
             except 
                [ :த | :வ ] _ 0: %>: %{U%}: :ங %{Pul%}: :க ;

"Keeping AA for thaa, vaa"
%{AAIrr%}:Vy <=> [ :த | :வ ] _ %>: :ற ;
                 [ :த | :வ ] _ .#. ;
                 [ :த | :வ ] _ %>: %{Uimp%}: ;
                 [ :த | :வ ] _ 0: %>: %{U%}: :ங %{Pul%}: :க ;  
                 where Vy in ( ா ) ;

"Dropping irregular U after OO for poo"
%{UIrr%}:0 <=> %{OO%}: %>: _ ;
